Washington statutes.
RCW 41.05.751

Problem gambling account.

The problem gambling account is created in the state treasury. Money in the account may be spent only after appropriation. Expenditures from the account may be used only for the purposes of the program established under RCW 41.05.750.

[ 2018 c 201 s 2005; 2005 c 369 s 3. Formerly RCW 43.20A.892.]

NOTES:

Findings—Intent—Effective date—2018 c 201: See notes following RCW 41.05.018.

Findings—Intent—Severability—Effective date—2005 c 369: See notes following RCW 41.05.750.